Utah statutes.
7-7-27.   Liquidity prerequisite for loans and investments.

No association shall invest in any security, other than in liquid assets, or in any loan at any time when its liquid assets are less than 4% of its savings liability unless the commissioner has issued written approval.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

